Washington statutes.
RCW 11.76.180

Order maturing claim not due.

If there be any claim not due the court may in its discretion, after hearing upon such notice as may be determined by it, mature such claim and direct that the same be paid in the due course of the administration.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.76.180. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 178; RRS s 1548; prior: Code 1881 s 1567; 1854 p 298 s 189.]